Hawaii statutes.
[§321-326] Rules. The director shall
adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this part, including the
establishment of criteria to determine eligibility to participate in the
services provided under this part. [L 1988, c 203, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next